Utah statutes.
35A-7-103.   Establishment of registry.

(1) (a)  The Department of Workforce Services, through contract with the Office of Recovery Services, shall establish a centralized new hire registry database for the purpose of receiving and maintaining information on newly hired or rehired employees.

(b)  The database shall be formatted to conduct automatic comparisons as described in Section 35A-7-105 by October 1, 1997.

(2)  Information in the registry will be used to match the employee's employment records with other databases to allow for the rapid implementation of support orders and verification of employment status.

